Idaho statutes. Title 28 COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS
Chapter 3
UNIFORM COMMERCIAL CODE — NEGOTIABLE INSTRUMENTS

Part 1. General Provisions and Definitions

Sec.

Part 2. Negotiation, Transfer, And Indorsement

Part 3. Enforcement of Instruments

Part 4. Liability of Parties

Part 5. Dishonor

Part 6. Discharge and Payment

Part 7. Advice of International Sight Draft

Part 8. Miscellaneous